Wyoming, session 2026, HB0031.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-5-233(a) by creating a new
paragraph (ix) and 31-5-234(a) by creating a new paragraph
(v) are amended to read:

31-5-233. Driving or having control of vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or controlled
substances; penalties.

HB0031

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0225
(a) As used in this section:

(ix) "Vehicle" means as defined by W.S.
31-5-102(a)(lviii). "Vehicle" does not include horses,
mules or other equines when ridden by a person.

31-5-234. Unlawful operation of vehicle by youthful
driver with detectable alcohol concentration; penalty.

(a) As used in this section:

(v) "Vehicle" means as defined by W.S.
31-5-102(a)(lviii). "Vehicle" does not include horses,
mules or other equines when ridden by a person.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0031